lexc/adj/enhuadjmnossz.lexc
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez211§t       #;  ! at, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Case111
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! at, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

Lexicon Tocase1
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possm;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurm;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famm;

LEXICON Possm
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famm;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famm;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famm;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famm;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famm;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famm;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famm;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famm;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famm;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famm;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famm;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famm;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famm;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famm;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famm;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famm;
LEXICON Plurm
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genm;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genm;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Genm;
                            Genm1;

LEXICON Famm
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genm;
                       Genm1;

!Use Case of Tocase/Tocase1

LEXICON Genm
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
  
LEXICON Genm1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;

LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
							Ik;


LEXICON AddAdji
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1i;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasei;


Lexicon Tocasei
[stem]+Adj:0     Possi;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluri;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fami;


LEXICON Possi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Sup:^+cSup^§AA§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fami;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fami;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fami;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fami;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fami;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fami;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fami;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Fami;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fami;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Fami;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fami;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Fami;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fami;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Fami;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fami;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fami;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fami;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Fami;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fami;

LEXICON Pluri
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Geni;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Geni; 
                            Geni;

LEXICON Fami
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Geni;
                       Geni;

LEXICON Geni
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casei;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casei;
                       Casei;
LEXICON Casei
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! at, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

Lexicon Tocase1i
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possim;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurim;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famim;

LEXICON Adj2num
szempontú AddAdji;
LEXICON Adj3igek
csattogató AddAdji;
fejezőerejű AddAdji;
idegző AddAdji;
látnivágyó AddAdji;
printelt AddAdji;
száradáslassító AddAdji;
íráskönnyítő AddAdji;
LEXICON Adj
adóügyi AddAdji;
alacsonylelkű AddAdji;
alkotmányügyi AddAdji;
alvadékgátló AddAdji;
antikvált AddAdji;
aranyharapdáló AddAdji;
asszonyfektető AddAdji;
aviváló AddAdji;
bakfiskodó AddAdji;
baritzi AddAdji;
bellovicsi AddAdji;
beszédértő AddAdji;
bikaszemű AddAdji;
bociképű AddAdji;
bokafagyasztó AddAdji;
bootolandó AddAdji;
bortnyiki AddAdji;
brehmi AddAdji;
buzamezei AddAdji;
bérfejlesztési AddAdji;
bőráncú AddAdji;
cirókahosszúmezei AddAdji;
csekélyszámú AddAdji;
csillogásgátló AddAdji;
csoportkezelési AddAdji;
csőnélküli AddAdji;
célszerűségi AddAdji;
daviesi AddAdji;
dobrovicsi AddAdji;
dudithi AddAdji;
dzsesszszerű AddAdji;
edeni AddAdji;
együttnemző AddAdji;
elevenfogó AddAdji;
emancipálódó AddAdji;
erkölcsnélküli AddAdji;
ezüstfényű AddAdji;
falcsiki AddAdji;
farterhelt AddAdji;
fehérszárnyú AddAdji;
feladatorientált AddAdji;
ferencjózsefi AddAdji;
finompórusú AddAdji;
folyóméternyi AddAdji;
fotóművészeti AddAdji;
félelemnélküli AddAdji;
fókuszolható AddAdji;
fürgekezű AddAdji;
főfő AddAdji;
galliki AddAdji;
germaini AddAdji;
graili AddAdji;
gyengeakaratú AddAdji;
gyorsfagyasztó AddAdji;
gyulladásokozó AddAdji;
gázköpő AddAdji;
gőzsugárálló AddAdji;
hajlottvégű AddAdji;
hammarskjöldi AddAdji;
harangszabású AddAdji;
hasizomrepesztő AddAdji;
határvédő AddAdji;
helymegjelölő AddAdji;
hitelintézeti AddAdji;
homlokzattagoló AddAdji;
hosszanjátszó AddAdji;
hosszútestű AddAdji;
hálózatfelügyeleti AddAdji;
hévizgyörki AddAdji;
idegenajkú AddAdji;
idézettségi AddAdji;
igényérvényesítési AddAdji;
indeterminált AddAdji;
információnyújtó AddAdji;
intranzitívosító AddAdji;
iskolamesteri AddAdji;
istókovitsi AddAdji;
janovitsi AddAdji;
jelenvaló AddAdji;
jogelvi AddAdji;
járdafelőli AddAdji;
jóeszű AddAdji;
jólértesült AddAdji;
józangondolkodású AddAdji;
jövedelemszerzési AddAdji;
kamatfizetési AddAdji;
kapcsolatkövető AddAdji;
karrázó AddAdji;
kecskecsöcsű AddAdji;
keményszájú AddAdji;
keresletgeneráló AddAdji;
kerékabroncsfeszítő AddAdji;
kesztyűbőrszagosító AddAdji;
kirendeltségvezető AddAdji;
kiskapacitású AddAdji;
kisszintű AddAdji;
klubkönyvtárvezető AddAdji;
kohoniczi AddAdji;
kompaktszabályozó AddAdji;
konfliktustompító AddAdji;
kontraindikált AddAdji;
koponyabelseji AddAdji;
koromtalanító AddAdji;
kovalcsiki AddAdji;
krómkombinált AddAdji;
kutatásorientált AddAdji;
kártyaellenőrző AddAdji;
képernyőblokkoló AddAdji;
kézhezsimuló AddAdji;
kökösbácstelki AddAdji;
könnyszentelte AddAdji;
környezetmegóvó AddAdji;
kötelességszerű AddAdji;
közlekedésjavító AddAdji;
középszintű AddAdji;
kükemezei AddAdji;
labirintusépítő AddAdji;
lakásügyi AddAdji;
lazarovitsi AddAdji;
lencsealakú AddAdji;
livingstonei AddAdji;
lukcsicsi AddAdji;
lánglelkű AddAdji;
lélekelemző AddAdji;
léleksuvasztó AddAdji;
lélekvesztő AddAdji;
léptékhű AddAdji;
lövedékálló AddAdji;
magasfokú AddAdji;
magyarajkú AddAdji;
magömlő AddAdji;
marhakínzó AddAdji;
marú AddAdji;
mellékletbehúzó AddAdji;
mentovichi AddAdji;
mezővédő AddAdji;
mindeddigi AddAdji;
miákitsi AddAdji;
mosolytápláló AddAdji;
munkakedvfokozó AddAdji;
máshitű AddAdji;
mélygyökerű AddAdji;
mérföldhosszú AddAdji;
művészetpusztító AddAdji;
nagyhomlokú AddAdji;
nagyolvadáspontú AddAdji;
nagytérségi AddAdji;
nemharctéri AddAdji;
nemzetképző AddAdji;
noéi AddAdji;
nyíltvízi AddAdji;
névviselési AddAdji;
oldalmenti AddAdji;
országveszejtő AddAdji;
pankrációrajongó AddAdji;
paulovicsi AddAdji;
pincészetvezető AddAdji;
politikaelemző AddAdji;
printelési AddAdji;
pufókarcú AddAdji;
pékszomorító AddAdji;
rajzfilmkedvelő AddAdji;
remetemezei AddAdji;
rigómezei AddAdji;
rosszerkölcsű AddAdji;
részecskekövető AddAdji;
röviduralkodású AddAdji;
sekélyvizű AddAdji;
somssichi AddAdji;
struktúrajavító AddAdji;
szabálytisztelő AddAdji;
szellemfékező AddAdji;
szenttéavató AddAdji;
szerződésfüggő AddAdji;
szoftverellenőrző AddAdji;
szulfitredukáló AddAdji;
számszerűségi AddAdji;
szénvagyonpótló AddAdji;
szívfonnyasztó AddAdji;
szívóhangtompító AddAdji;
szúnyogvonzó AddAdji;
sávszűkítő AddAdji;
tananyagcsökkentő AddAdji;
technikaromboló AddAdji;
televíziójavító AddAdji;
termeléscsökkentő AddAdji;
természettisztelő AddAdji;
tigrisbajszú AddAdji;
tomcsiki AddAdji;
tucatfaló AddAdji;
turizmusvonzó AddAdji;
társadalomélénkítő AddAdji;
térstrukturáló AddAdji;
tömörítésgyorsító AddAdji;
törösi AddAdji;
unikumivó AddAdji;
valcerozó AddAdji;
varázshatalmú AddAdji;
versenyszűkítő AddAdji;
világkörüli AddAdji;
vojnichi AddAdji;
várbéli AddAdji;
vérnyomásfüggő AddAdji;
wlassicsi AddAdji;
zsúpozó AddAdji;
égbelépő AddAdji;
építésellenőrzési AddAdji;
ónbázisú AddAdji;
önkitekerő AddAdji;
újsástelki AddAdji;
ősszájú AddAdji;
